Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.037

Adjustment of pension of retired judges or widows or widowers.

(1) "Index" for the purposes of this section, shall mean, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items (1957-1959 equal one hundred) compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor;

(2) Effective July 1, 1970, every pension computed and payable under the provisions of RCW 2.12.030 to any retired judge or to his or her widow or widower which does not exceed four hundred fifty dollars per month shall be adjusted to that dollar amount which bears the ratio of its original dollar amount which is found to exist between the index for 1969 and the index for the calendar year prior to the effective retirement date of the person to whom, or on behalf of whom, such retirement allowance is being paid.

[ 2012 c 117 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 96 s 1.]